02_Morphology/morph.lexc
! basic morphotactics for twenty English nouns

Multichar_Symbols

%>
%<n%>
LEXICON Root

Nouns ;

LEXICON N

%<n%>: CASE ;

LEXICON CASE

%<pl%>:%>s #;
# ;

LEXICON Nouns

dog:dogs N ;
carrot:carrot N ;
park:park N ;
country:country N ;
television:television N ;
table:tables N ;
reality:reality N ;
court:court N ;
food:food N ;
paper:paper N ;
sky:sky N ;
shelf:shelf N ;
human:humans N ;
pen:pen N ;
tree:tree N ;
mineral:mineral N ;
privacy:privacy N ;
book:book N ;
bamboo:bamboo N ;
science:science N ;
